California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a city, county, or city and county from licensing, regulating, prohibiting, or permitting an individual who provides massage for compensation without a valid certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4614.

(a) Upon the request of any law enforcement agency or any other representative of a local government agency with responsibility for regulating or administering a local ordinance relating to massage or massage establishments, the council shall provide information concerning an applicant or a certificate holder, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The current status of an application or certificate.

(2) Any history of disciplinary actions.

(3) The home and work addresses of the applicant or certificate holder.

(4) The name and home and work addresses of any person whose certificate has been suspended and the length of the suspension, if the work address is located within the jurisdiction of agency making the request.

(5) Any other information in the council’s possession that is necessary to verify facts relevant to administering the local ordinance.

(b) Upon the request of the council, any law enforcement agency or any other representative of a local government agency with responsibility for regulating or administering a local ordinance relating to massage or massage establishments is authorized to provide information to the council concerning an applicant or certificate holder, including, but not limited to,
 any of the following:

(1) The current status of any local application or permit.

(2) Any history of legal or administrative action taken against the applicant or certificate holder.

(3) Any information related to criminal activity or unprofessional conduct allegedly engaged in by a certificate applicant or certificate holder, including, but not limited to, police reports and declarations of conduct.

(4) The home and work addresses of the applicant or certificate holder.

(5) Any other information in the possession of the law enforcement agency or other local government agency that is necessary
 to verify information or otherwise implement this chapter.

(c) The council shall accept information provided by any law enforcement agency or any other representative of a local government agency with responsibility for regulating or administering a local ordinance relating to massage and review that information in a timely manner. The council shall have the responsibility to review any information received pursuant to this subdivision and to take any actions authorized by this chapter that are warranted by that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.

(a) The council shall have the responsibility to determine whether the school from which an applicant has obtained the education required by this chapter meets the requirements of this chapter.

(1) If the council has any reason to question whether or not the applicant received the education that is required by this chapter from the school or schools that the applicant is claiming, the council may investigate the facts to determine that the applicant received the required education before issuing a certificate.

(2) For purposes of this section and any other provision of this chapter that authorizes the council to receive factual information as a condition of taking any action, the council may conduct
 oral interviews of the applicant and others or conduct any investigation deemed necessary to establish that the information received is accurate and satisfies the criteria established by this chapter.

(b) (1) The council shall develop policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws governing the requirements and process for approving, denying approval of, imposing corrective action on, or unapproving schools consistent with Section 4601. These policies, procedures, rules, or bylaws shall address topics, including, but not limited to, what constitutes an acceptable curriculum, facility requirements, student-teacher ratios, clinical practice requirements, and provisions for the acceptance of accreditation from a recognized accreditation body or other form of acceptance.

(2) The approval process for a school shall be consistent with the following timelines:

(A) (i) On or before 30 days from the date the council receives an initial application for school approval, the council shall notify the school whether or not, for the purpose of preliminary review, the application is complete.

(ii) A notice that an initial application is not complete for the purpose of preliminary review shall specify what additional documents or payment of fees the school is required to submit to the council to make the application complete for the purpose of preliminary review.

(B) Within 60 days from the date the council notifies the school that the initial application is not complete for purposes of preliminary review, the school shall provide the missing information and pay the required fees. If a school fails to do so, the council shall purge the application. The council
 may, in its sole discretion, provide a school with an additional 30 days to make its application complete for purposes of preliminary review. A school with a purged application may submit a new application for school approval, including the required fees, without prejudice, after 180 days have passed from the effective date of purging. The council shall post on its internet website the effective date of purging.

(C) (i) On or before one year from the date the council receives an initial application for approval as a school, the council shall approve the school, propose to deny approval of the school, or notify the school that corrective action is required. The council reserves the right to issue a one-time notice of corrective action on an initial application. If the school fails to adequately rectify the deficiencies, the council may deny the application.

(ii) Within one year from the date that the council notifies a school of its proposed decision to deny approval of an initial application for school approval, the council shall notify the school of its final decision pursuant to any oral telephonic hearing or consideration of a written statement provided in opposition to the proposed decision to deny approval of the initial application for school approval.

(D) A school may appeal the council’s final decision to deny approval of the school. An appeal of the council’s final decision to deny approval of a school shall be heard at the next board of directors meeting with a date, as posted on the council’s internet website, that is at least 120 days from the last date for the school to timely request an appeal, unless a timely request for a continuance of the hearing date is granted. The council may, in its discretion, for good cause, continue the date an appeal may be heard, in which
 case the appeal shall be heard at a later board of directors meeting. The council shall notify the school of its right to appeal pursuant to this subdivision at the time of the final decision.

(3) The council shall exercise its authority to approve, deny approval of, and unapprove schools and specify corrective action in keeping with the purposes set forth in Section 4603.

(c) The council may charge a reasonable fee for the inspection or approval of schools, provided the fees do not exceed the reasonable cost of the inspection or approval process.

(d) The council shall note on its internet website the date that a letter proposing to deny a school’s application for approval or reapproval or requesting corrective action has been sent to the school and the final outcome and date of that proposed action.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Initial application” means a new application submitted by a school for school approval.

(2) “Complete application,” for purposes of preliminary review, means an application that the council, after preliminary review, has determined contains all the necessary documents for the council to begin a more thorough review process that allows the council to make a decision to approve or propose to deny the application for school approval or request corrective action. A complete application is not an approved application and a determination by the council upon preliminary review that an application is complete shall not prejudice the council’s ability to later determine that the application is not complete.

(3) “Preliminary review” means an initial review conducted by the council to determine if all fees have been paid and if all application and supporting documents have been submitted, so that the council can move forward and begin a more thorough review process. The preliminary review process does not include completion of a site visit or completion of background checks for noncertified individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 7.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.5.

A school offering a professional massage therapy program that has not been approved by the council pursuant to this chapter, before enrolling a student in the school, shall notify the student in writing and obtain a signed confirmation from the student that the student has received written notification of the following: 

(a) That the school is not approved by the council.

(b) That the education completed at the school cannot be used to satisfy
 any of the requirements for certification as a massage therapist or massage practitioner in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.   (AB 775)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.

The council shall be sued only in the county of its principal office, which shall be in Sacramento, unless otherwise designated by the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4617.

The superior court of a county of competent jurisdiction may, upon a petition by any person, issue an injunction or any other relief the court deems appropriate for a violation of this chapter by any person or establishment operating in that county subject to the provisions of this chapter. An injunction proceeding under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4618.

The Legislature finds and declares that due to important health, safety, and welfare concerns that affect the entire state, establishing a uniform standard of certification for massage practitioners and massage therapists upon which consumers may rely to identify individuals who have achieved specified levels of education, training, and skill is a matter of statewide concern and not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this chapter shall apply to all cities, counties, and cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4619.

(a) This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(c) If any provision of this chapter or the application of these provisions to any person or circumstance is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision
 or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
 severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 4621.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.

(a) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the council shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 197, Sec. 8.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 10.5, commencing with Section 4600.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.7. Music Therapy  [4650. - 4657.]

4650.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Music Therapy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Existing national certification of music therapists requires the therapist to have graduated with a bachelor’s degree or its equivalent, or higher, from a music therapy degree program approved by the American Music Therapy Association (AMTA), successful completion of a minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised clinical work through preinternship training at an approved degree program, and internship training through approved national roster or university affiliated internship programs, or an equivalent.

(b) Upon successful completion of the AMTA academic and clinical training
 requirements or its international equivalent, an individual is eligible to sit for the national board certification exam administered by the Certification Board for Music Therapists (CBMT), an independent, nonprofit corporation fully accredited by the National Commission for Certifying Agencies.

(c) The CBMT grants the Music Therapist-Board Certified (MT-BC) credential to music therapists who have demonstrated the knowledge, skills, and abilities for competence in the current practice of music therapy. The purpose of board certification in music therapy is to provide an objective national standard that can be used as a measure of professionalism and competence by interested agencies, groups, and individuals.

(d) The MT-BC is awarded by the CBMT to an individual upon successful
 completion of an academic and clinical training program approved by the AMTA or an international equivalent and successful completion of an objective written examination demonstrating current competency in the profession of music therapy. The CBMT administers this examination, which is based on a nationwide music therapy practice analysis that is reviewed and updated every five years to reflect current clinical practice.

(e) Once certified, a music therapist must adhere to the CBMT Code of Professional Practice and recertify every five years through either a program of continuing education or reexamination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter do the following:

(a) Provide a statutory definition of music therapy.

(b) Enable consumers and state and local agencies to more easily identify qualified music therapists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Music therapy” means the clinical and evidence-based use of music therapy interventions in developmental, rehabilitative, habilitative, medical, mental health, preventive, wellness care, or educational settings to address physical, emotional, cognitive, and social needs of individuals within a therapeutic relationship. Music therapy includes the following:

(1) The development of music therapy treatment plans specific to the needs and strengths of the client who may be seen individually or in groups.

(2) Music therapy plans shall
 establish goals, objectives, and potential strategies of the music therapy services appropriate for the client and setting.

(b) “Music therapy interventions” include, but are not limited to, music improvisation, receptive music listening, song writing, lyric discussion, music and imagery, singing, music performance, learning through music, music combined with other arts, music-assisted relaxation, music-based patient education, electronic music technology, adapted music intervention, and movement to music.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

An individual who provides music therapy shall not refer to oneself using the title of “Board Certified Music Therapist” unless the individual has completed all of the following:

(a) A bachelor’s degree or its equivalent, or higher, from a music therapy degree program approved by the American Music Therapy Association using current standards, beginning with those adopted on April 1, 2015.

(b) A minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised clinical work through
 preinternship training at an approved degree program and internship training through an approved national roster or university affiliated internship program, or the equivalent.

(c) The current requirements for certification, beginning with those adopted on April 1, 2015, established by the Certification Board for Music Therapists for the Music Therapist-Board Certified credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

This chapter shall not be construed to authorize a person engaged in music therapy to state or imply that they provide mental health counseling, psychotherapy, or occupational therapy for which a license is required under this division. While the use of music is not restricted to any profession, the use of music shall not imply or suggest that the person is a Board Certified Music Therapist, if they do not meet the criteria specified in Section 4654.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

It is an unfair business practice within the meaning of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7, for a person to use the title “Board Certified Music Therapist” if they do not meet the requirements of Section 4654.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

This chapter shall not be construed to require a music therapist currently employed by the State of California to obtain certification as a Board Certified Music Therapist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Veterinary Medicine [4800. - 4920.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [4800. - 4811.]

4800.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a California Veterinary Medical Board in which the administration of this chapter is vested. The board shall consist of the following nine members:

(1) Four licensed veterinarians, at least one of whom shall practice in equine or livestock care, or both.

(2) Two registered veterinary technicians.

(3) Three public members.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the
 repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. However, the review of the board shall be limited to those issues identified by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature and shall involve the preparation or submission of a sunset review document or evaluative questionnaire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4800.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the California Veterinary Medical Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 56.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

(a) Each veterinarian member of the board shall be a bona fide resident of this state for a period of at least five years immediately preceding their appointment and shall have been a licensed veterinarian under this chapter and actually engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine in this state during that period.

(b) Each registered veterinary technician member of the
 board shall be a bona fide resident of this state for a period of at least five years immediately preceding their appointment and shall have been registered under this chapter and actually engaged in the practice of a registered veterinary technician in this state during that period.

(c) Each public member of the board shall be a bona fide resident of this state for a period of at least five years immediately preceding their appointment and shall not be a licensee or registrant of the board, any other board under this division, or any board
 referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(d) No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 4.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

The members of the board shall hold office for a term of four years. Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which they were appointed, whichever first occurs. A member may be reappointed subject to the limitation contained in Section 4801.

Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term, within 90 days after they occur.

The Governor shall appoint the four veterinarian members, the two registered veterinary technician members, and one public member, qualified as provided in Section 4801. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the
 Assembly shall each appoint a public member, qualified as provided in Section 4801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 5.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.

The Governor may, in his judgment, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other sufficient cause, after due notice and hearing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

The board shall elect a president, vice president, and any other officers of the board as shall be necessary, from its membership. The Attorney General shall act as counsel for the board and the members thereof in their official or individual capacity for any act done under the color of official right.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 642, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.5.

(a) The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in them by this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 2.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

The executive officer of the board may administer oaths or affirmations upon matters pertaining to the business of the board. Any person willfully making any false oath or affirmation is guilty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 35.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 642, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.

Five members of the board constitute a quorum for transaction of business at any meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 538, Sec. 6.   (AB 1980)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4808.

The board may in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter. The board may hold meetings that are necessary for the transaction of business. It shall issue all licenses to practice veterinary medicine and all registrations to practice as a veterinary technician in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 80, Sec. 2.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.

The board shall keep an official record of its meetings, and it shall also keep an official register of all applicants for licenses.

The register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 477.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.5.

The board may at any time inspect the premises in which veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, or veterinary surgery is being practiced. The board’s inspection authority does not extend to premises that are not registered with the board. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the board’s ability to investigate alleged unlicensed activity or to inspect a premises for which registration has lapsed or is delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 21.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.6.

The enforcement of Sections 4809.5 and 4854 of this chapter is a function exclusively reserved to the California Veterinary Medical Board and the state has preempted and occupied this field of enforcing the cleanliness and sanitary requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 57.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.7.

The board shall establish a regular inspection program that will provide for random announced or unannounced inspections of veterinary premises. The board shall make every reasonable effort to ensure veterinary premises are inspected in a timely manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 3.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.8.

(a) The board shall establish an advisory committee to assist, advise, and make recommendations for the implementation of rules and regulations necessary to ensure proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and to assist the board in its examination, licensure, and registration programs. The committee shall serve only in an advisory capacity to the board and the objectives, duties, and actions of the committee shall not be a substitute for or conflict with any of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the board. The committee shall be known as the Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee. The multidisciplinary committee shall consist of nine members. The following members of the multidisciplinary committee shall be appointed by the board from lists of nominees solicited by the board: four licensed
 veterinarians, two registered veterinary technicians, and one public member. The committee shall also include one veterinarian member of the board and one registered veterinary technician member of the board, both to be appointed by the board president. Members of the multidisciplinary committee shall represent a sufficient cross section of the interests in veterinary medicine in order to address the issues before it, as determined by the board, including veterinarians, registered veterinary technicians, and members of the public.

(b) Multidisciplinary committee members appointed by the board shall serve for a term of three years and appointments shall be staggered accordingly. A member may be reappointed, but no person shall serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term, within 90 days after they occur. Board members of the multidisciplinary
 committee shall serve concurrently with their terms of office on the board.

(c) The multidisciplinary committee shall be subject to the requirements of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Multidisciplinary committee members shall receive a per diem as provided in Section 103 and shall be compensated for their actual travel expenses in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Human Resources.

(e) The board may remove a member of the multidisciplinary committee appointed by the board for continued neglect of a duty required by this chapter, for incompetency, or for unprofessional conduct.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
 multidisciplinary committee, in implementing this section, give appropriate consideration to issues pertaining to the practice of registered veterinarian technicians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 4.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4810.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the California Veterinary Medical Board.

(b) “Multidisciplinary committee” means the Veterinary Medicine Multidisciplinary Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 4809.8.

(c) “Regulations” means the rules and regulations set forth in Division 20 (commencing with Section 2000) of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 58.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4811.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Veterinary Medicine Practice Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 60, Sec. 11.   Effective July 6, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Practice Provisions [4825. - 4831.]

4825.

It is unlawful for any person to practice veterinary medicine or any branch thereof in this State unless at the time of so doing, such person holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked license as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1395.)
-------------------------------------------

4825.1.

These definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter as it applies to veterinary medicine.

(a) “Client” means the individual or individuals who represent to the veterinarian that they are the owner or owners of the animal patient at the time that the services are provided.

(b) “Diagnosis” means the act or process of identifying or determining the health status of an animal patient through examination and the opinion derived from that examination.

(c) “Animal” means any member of the animal kingdom other than humans, and includes fowl, fish, and reptiles, wild or domestic, whether living or dead.

(d) “Food animal” means any animal that is raised for the production of an edible product intended for consumption by humans. The edible product includes, but is not limited to, milk, meat, and eggs. Food animal includes, but is not limited to, cattle (beef or dairy), swine, sheep, poultry, fish, and amphibian species.

(e) “Livestock” includes all animals, poultry, aquatic and amphibian species that are raised, kept, or used for profit. It does not include those species that are usually kept as pets such as dogs, cats, and pet birds, or companion animals, including equines.

(f) “Synchronous” means a real-time interaction between a client and animal patient with a veterinarian who is licensed in this state and located at a distant site. 

(g) “Telehealth”
 means the mode of delivering veterinary medicine via electronic communication technologies to facilitate the diagnosis, consultation, care management, or treatment of an animal patient, and includes, but is not limited to, synchronous video and audio communication; synchronous, two-way audio communication; and electronic transmission of images, diagnostics, data, and medical information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   (AB 1399)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.

A person practices veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, and the various branches thereof, when the person does any one of the following:

(a) Represents oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry in any of its branches.

(b) Diagnoses or prescribes a drug, medicine, appliance, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals.

(c) Administers a drug, medicine, appliance, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the
 prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals, except where the medicine, appliance, application, or treatment is administered by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant at the direction of and under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian subject to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4836) or where the drug, including, but not limited to, a drug that is a controlled substance, is administered by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant pursuant to Section 4836.1. However, no person, other than a licensed veterinarian, may induce anesthesia unless authorized by regulation of the board.

(d) Performs a surgical or dental operation upon an animal.

(e) Performs a tendonectomy, onychectomy, or any
 type of claw removal on a feline. 

(f) Performs any manual procedure for the diagnosis of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock or Equidae.

(g) Collects blood from an animal for the purpose of transferring or selling that blood and blood component products to a licensed veterinarian at a registered premises, except where the blood is collected by a registered veterinary technician or veterinary assistant at the direction of, and under the direct supervision of, a licensed veterinarian subject to Article 2.5 (commencing with
 Section 4836) or where the blood is collected by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant pursuant to Section 4836.5. For purposes of this section, “blood and blood component products” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4920.

(h) Uses any words, letters, or titles in such connection or under such circumstances as to induce the belief that the person using them is engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry. This use shall be prima facie evidence of the intention to represent oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary
 dentistry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.   (AB 867)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.1.

A veterinarian who on his or her own initiative, at the request of an owner, or at the request of someone other than the owner, renders emergency treatment to a sick or injured animal at the scene of an accident shall not be liable in damages to the owner of that animal in the absence of gross negligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, or a veterinary assistant working under the supervision of a veterinarian, may provide veterinary care and treatment for any animal restricted pursuant to Section 2118 of the Fish and Game Code. A veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, or a veterinary assistant working under the supervision of a veterinarian, may lawfully possess one or more of the animals only for the period of time that, in his or her judgment, veterinary care and treatment are necessary. No veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, or veterinary assistant working under the supervision of a veterinarian, has a duty to advise law enforcement if he or she
 becomes aware that one or more of the animals is possessed in the state. For the purposes of this section, “veterinary care and treatment” does not include boarding when no veterinary care or treatment is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (AB 1839)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, a veterinary technician, veterinary assistant, and veterinary assistant controlled substances permitholder registered in this state shall wear a name tag identification in at least 18 point type in any area of the veterinary premises that is accessible to members of the public. The name tag shall include the veterinary technician, veterinary assistant, and veterinary assistant controlled substances permitholder’s name, and, if applicable, the license, registration, or permit type and number issued by the board.

(b) A person subject to the requirement in subdivision (a) may remove the name tag when working with or handling animal patients.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 3.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.4.

(a) A California-licensed veterinarian at premises registered in accordance with Section 4853 that is located within a 25-mile radius of any condition of emergency specified in Section 8558 of the Government Code may, in good faith, do both of the following in addition to any other acts authorized by law:

(1) Render necessary and prompt care and treatment to an animal patient without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship if conditions are such that one cannot be established in a timely manner.

(2) Dispense or prescribe a dangerous drug or device, as defined in Section 4022, in reasonable quantities where failure to provide services or medications, including
 controlled substances, may result in loss of life or intense suffering of the animal patient. Prior to refilling a prescription pursuant to this paragraph, the veterinarian shall make a reasonable effort to contact the originally prescribing veterinarian.
